tr: Kap malzemesi: Alüminyum; Cam; Kağıt karton; Plastik (HDPE); Plastik (PET); Paslanmaz çelik; Tetra Pak karton; Diğer
en: Container material: Aluminum; Glass; Paper carton; Plastic (HDPE); Plastic (PET); Stainless steel; Tetra Pak carton; Other
sl-SI: Material za embalažo: Aluminij; Steklo; Papirnata embalaža (karton); Plastika (HDPE); Plastika (PET); Nerjavno jeklo; Embalaža Tetra Pak; Drugo
es: Material del contenedor: Aluminio; Vidrio; Cartón de papel; Plástico (HDPE); Plástico (PET); Acero inoxidable; Envase Tetra Pak; Otro
sk-SK: Materiál zásobníka: Hliník; Sklo; Papierový kartón; Plast (HDPE); Plast (PET); Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Kartón Tetra Pak; Iné
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำบรรจุภัณฑ์: อะลูมิเนียม; แก้ว; กล่องกระดาษ; พลาสติก (HDPE); พลาสติก (PET); สเตนเลสสตีล; กล่อง Tetra Pak; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 货柜材质: 铝; 玻璃; 纸盒; 塑料 (HDPE); 塑料 (PET); 不锈钢; 利乐包; 其他
nl: Container materiaal: Aluminium; Glas; Karton; Plastic (HDPE); Plastic (PET); Roestvrij staal; Tetra Pak-karton; Overig
hu: Tárolóeszköz anyaga: Alumínium; Üveg; Papírkarton; Műanyag (HDPE); Műanyag (PET); Rozsdamentes acél; Tetra Pak karton; Egyéb
sv: Behållarens material: Aluminium; Glas; Papperskartong; Plast (HDPE); Plast (PET); Rostfritt stål; Tetra Pak-kartong; Annat
fi: Säilön materiaali: Alumiini; Lasi; Paperikartonki; Muovi (HDPE); Muovi (PET); Ruostumaton teräs; Tetra Pak -kartonki; Muu
de: Material des Containers: Aluminium; Glas; Papierkarton; Kunststoff (HDPE); Kunststoff (PET); Edelstahl; Tetra Pak-Karton; Sonstige
ro-RO: Materialul containerului: Aluminiu; Sticlă; Carton; Plastic (HDPE); Plastic (PET); Oțel inoxidabil; Cutie Tetra Pak; Altele
fr: Matériau du conteneur: Aluminium; Verre; Carton papier; Plastique (HDPE); Plastique (PET); Acier inoxydable; Brique Tetra Pak; Autre
bg-BG: Материал на контейнера: Алуминий; Стъкло; Картон; Пластмаса (HDPE); Пластмаса (PET); Неръждаема стомана; Опаковка Tetra Pak; Друг
it: materiale di patata: Alluminio; Vetro; Cartone; Plastica (HDPE); Plastica (PET); Acciaio inossidabile; Cartone Tetra Pak; Altro
da: Beholdermateriale: Aluminium; Glas; Papkarton; Plast (HDPE); Plast (PET); Rustfrit stål; Tetra Pak-karton; Andet
pt-BR: Material do recipiente: Alumínio; Vidro; Embalagem de papel; Plástico (PEAD); Plástico (PET); Aço inoxidável; Embalagem Tetra Pak; Outro
ja: コンテナ素材: アルミニウム; ガラス; 紙パック; プラスチック (HDPE); プラスチック (PET); ステンレス; テトラパック; その他
hr-HR: Materijal spremnika: Aluminij; Staklo; Papirnati karton; Plastika (HDPE); Plastika (PET); Nehrđajući čelik; Karton Tetra Pak; Ostalo
el: Υλικό δοχείου: Αλουμίνιο; Γυαλί; Χάρτινο κουτί; Πλαστικό (HDPE); Πλαστικό (PET); Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Χάρτινη συσκευασία Tetra Pak; Άλλο
cs: Materiál nádoby: Hliník; Sklo; Papírový karton; Plast (HDPE); Plast (PET); Nerezová ocel; Karton Tetra Pak; Jiné
ru: Материал контейнера: Алюминий; Стекло; Бумажная коробка; Пластик (HDPE); Пластик (PET); Нержавеющая сталь; Упаковка Tetra Pak; Другое
pt-PT: Material do recipiente: Alumínio; Vidro; Embalagem de cartão; Plástico (HDPE); Plástico (PET); Aço inoxidável; Embalagem Tetra Pak; Outro
ko: 컨테이너 재질: 알루미늄; 유리; 종이 카톤; 플라스틱(HDPE); 플라스틱(PET); 스테인리스 스틸; 테트라팩 카톤; 기타
vi: Vật liệu thùng đựng: Nhôm; Thủy tinh; Hộp giấy; Nhựa (HDPE); Nhựa (PET); Thép không gỉ; Hộp Tetra Pak; Khác
lt-LT: Talpyklos medžiaga: Aliuminis; Stiklas; Popierinė dėžutė; Plastikas (HDPE); Plastikas (PET); Nerūdijantysis plienas; „Tetra Pak“ pakuotė; Kita
zh-TW: 容器材質: 鋁; 玻璃; 紙盒; 塑膠 (HDPE); 塑膠 (PET); 不鏽鋼; 利樂包; 其他
pl: Materiał pojemnika: Aluminium; Szkło; Karton papierowy; Tworzywo sztuczne (HDPE); Tworzywo sztuczne (PET); Stal nierdzewna; Karton Tetra Pak; Inny
nb: Beholdermateriale: Aluminium; Glass; Pappkartong; Plast (HDPE); Plast (PET); Rustfritt stål; Tetra Pak-kartong; Annet